tex/patterns/utf8/hyph-hu.tex
ű2s1u
ű1t2r
ű1u2
ű1ú
ű1ü2
ű1ű
űve2r
űves1s
űza2
űz1ak
űz1an
ű2z1á
ű2z1el
ű2z1e2r
ű2z1e2s
űz1ev
űz1érm
ű2z1im
ű2z1is
ű2z1o2
ű2z1ör
űz1ö2v
űz1őr.
űz1őrs
űz1őrz
űz1p2
űz3su
1va
vaa2
va2d1ál
va2d1ár
va2d1e2
vadi2
va2did
va2d1ol
v1a2dón
va2dö
va2d1ő
va2d3z
va2ge
vaja2
va2j1ad
va2j1e
va2jö
va2k1e2s
va2n1eg
van1es
va2név
2vang
van3n
va2nol
va2n1ó2
va2nö
vao2
va2r1al
va2rany
va2rar
va2r1ir
2varú
va2s1aj
va2s1e2
va2sék
va2sid
va2s1in
va2sö
vas3sze
vas3szé
vast2
vas1tr
va2s1ü
vasz3s
va2t1á2r
va2t1é
vat1int
vatt2
1vá
váb2bal
váb2be
vá2csi
vá2csü
vá2dal
vádi2
vá2dir
v1állap
v1állás
2vállo
2vállv
vá2ma
vá2m1á
vá2m1e
vá2mi
vá2m1u2
vá2n1a2r
vá2n1ár
vá2ne
vá2nis
vá2nú
vá2ny1as
vá2ny1e
vány1ér
vá2ral
vá2re
2várf
vá2ris
vá2r1oml
vá2rö
várs2
vár1sp
vá2ruh
vá2rus
vá2r1ú2
vá2szi
v1átm
vá2t1ors
2v1á2tü
vá2zal
vá2z1e2
vá2ziz
váz3sz
vd2
v1dr
1ve
ve2g1a2
ve2g1á
ve2g1ele
veg1ért
ve2g1i
ve2gí
ve2g1ö
ve2gya
ve2gy1e2lem
ve2gyemb
ve2gyér
ve2gyip
ve2il
2v1elég
2v1elhá
2v1elm
ve2l1o
2v1elvá
2v1e2mel
2v1eml
vene2g
ve2n1egy
ve2n1emb
ve2n1esz
ve2n1e2v
ve2n1év
ven3n
ve2nó
ve2nö
ve1p2
vera2
ve2r1á
ve2r1eng
ve2r1esz
ve2r1ip
ve2r1ol
ve2ror
ve2ró
2verősítő.
2verősítőr
vers3s
ver2s3ze
ve2sa
ve2ser
ve2sú
ve2süv
2v1eszm
ve2s3zö
ve2t1a2
ve2tár
1vé
vé2der
vé2do
vé2dz
vé2ga
vé2gá
vé2g1eg
vé2g1ele
vé2g1er
vé2geté
végig1
vé2gin
vé2g1í2
vé2gó
vé2la
vé2l1á2
vé2l1e2r
vé2l1o
vé2lu
vé2nas
vé2ny1e2l
vé1p2
vé2pí
vé2r1á2
vé2rel
vé2ron
2vérté
vé2rú
vé2rül
vé2sz1á2
vé2szeg
vé2sz1o
vé2tí
2v1év.
v1f2
vgé2
vhez1
1vi
2vick
vi2cs1a
vi2csö
2v1i2dő
vi2dz
2v1inh
vin2t1es
vi2pa
2v1i2rat.
2v1i2rata
2v1i2ratá
2v1i2rath
2virati
2v1iratk
2v1i2ratok
2v1i2ratot
2viratoz.
2viratozi
2v1i2rats
2v1i2ratv
2v1ism
vissz1e2
2v1izg
1ví
2v1í2rás.
2vírász.
2vírászat.
2v1írda
2vírdáb
2v1í2ró
ví2z1a2
ví2zá
víze2
ví2z1el
ví2zer
ví2z1es
ví2z1o
ví2zó
ví2zs
2vízű
v1k2
1vo
vo2lál
vo2l1e2
vo2r1a
vo2se
vos3s
1vó
vóé2
v1ó2rá
vó1s2p
vó2s3zen
vóví2
1vö
vöt2
1vő
vőu2
v1p2
vso2rol
vsza2ké
v1t2
1vu
2v1u2t
1vú
vú2sz
1vü
2vüg
vü2gy
vü2les
v1ünn
2v1ü2t
2v1üz
1vű
1vy
1wa
wa2e
wa2i
wa2le
wa1sh
wat2t1á2
1wá
1we
we2b1o
we2i
we2ö
wesze1
1wé
w2h
whi2
1wi
wi2c
wi2e
wi2r
1wí
1wo2
1wó
1wö
1wő
1wu
1wú
1wü
1wű
1xa
2x1a2l
x1ar
1xá
x1b2
1xe
2xe2g
1xé
1xi
2xidj
2xido
2xidt
2xio
xi2ol
xi2on
1xí
x1ív
1xo
xo2d
xo2g
1xó
1xö
1xő
xpor2t1á2r
1xu
xusá2
xu2s1é
xus3s
1xú
2x1ü2
1xű
x2x
yaá2
y1abl
ya2cél
y1a2dag
y1a2dón
yae2
ya2gar
ya2g1ál
ya2gá2r
yag1ár.
ya2ged
ya2g1el
ya2g1en
yag3g
ya2gig
ya2gor
yag1osz
y1agy.
ya2gyak
y1agyk
y1a2gyú
y1ajt
ya2kala
yaké2r
yak1ére
ya2kiz
y1a2lak.
ya2l1ék.
y1alm
ya2m1al
ya2m1ár.
ya2m1árb
ya2m1árh
ya2m1árn
ya2mel
ya2m1is
yan1ar
yan1at
ya2n1e
ya2n1i
yan1o2d
ya2nő
yan1ők
yan1őt
ya2nyáé
ya2nyái
ya2nyák
ya2nyám
ya2nyán
ya2nyát
y1anyj
y1a2nyó
ya2pa.
ya2pas
y1a2páb
y1a2pák
y1a2pám
y1a2pán
y1a2pár
y1a2pás
y1a2pát
y1a2páv
y1a2pi
yapo2tá
y1a2pó
y1app
ya1p2r
y1a2pu
y1a2rány
y1arcn
y1arco
y1arcr
1yard.
1yardn
ya2r1el
y1argu
ya2s1ol
y1atád
yat2te
y1a2ty
ya2utó
y1a2zon
y1ábr
yá2du
y1á2g
y1álar
yálas3
y1áld
yáma2
yá2man
yá2map
yá2m1as
yá2mí
yá2m1os
yá2mu
y1á2po
yá2rad
y1á2ram
y1árbo
yá2r1e
yá2r1i2p
yá2rö
y1árp
y1árud
y1á2ruh
yá2rul
y1á2rus
yár1ut
yá2sar
yási2
yá2sir
y1á2só
yá2sze
yás3zen
yá2szé
yá2szor
yá2szü
y1á2t1a
y1á2t1e2
y1áth
y1átk
y1átn
yátne2
y1áts
y1á2tü
y1b2
ybee2
ybor2d
y1d2r
ye2d1a
ye2dá
ye2d1ó2
ye2d1u
ye2g1a2
ye2gá
ye2g1el
yegész1
yeg1g
y1egy.
ye2gyen
ye2gyes
y1egyl
y1e2l1a2
y1elc
y1e2lemz
yeletes1
y1elha
ye2l1o
y1e2lőg
y1elr
y1eltá
ye2man
ye2mas
ye2mat
y1ember
ye2mel
ye2m1er
ye2m1es
ye2na
ye2n1á2
ye2ner
yenes1s
ye2n1é2l
ye2ni
ye2n1o
y1e2po
yereg1g
y1e2rej
y1e2rőr
ye2rőv
yers1s
yesa2
ye2s1al
ye2s1á
yes1egy
yesi2
ye2s1í2r
ye2sú
y1eszm
ye2s3zö
yes3zs
yesz2t1ék
ye2szű
ye2t1ér
y1e2ve
y1e2vé
y1e2vő
y1e2zer
yezernyolc1
y1é2ber
yé2g
y1égb
y1ége
y1éhes
yé2let
y1élm
yé2pí
y1é2pü
yé2rak
yér1ára
y1érde
yé2r1el
yé2ri
yé2rol
y1érték
y1érze
y1érzé
yé2sza
yé2szá
y1étk
y1é2tű
y1év.
y1évb
y1é2vek
yé2ven
y1é2ves
y1é2vet
y1é2vi
y1évn
y1évr
y1évv
y1f2l
y1f2r
yha2d
y2h1adó
y1icc
y1i2de
y1i2do
y1i2dő
y1ifj
y1i2gaz
yi1k2ri
y1i2má
y1imp
yi2nas
y1ind
y1inf
y1inge
y1i2par
yi2ram
y1i2rat.
y1i2rán
y1i2rás
y1i2rod
y1irt
y1ish
y1isk
y1ism
y1isn
yi2tal
y1i2vó
yí2le
yí2róé
yí2rói
yí2rón
yí2rór
yí2rót
y1í2v
yki2s1a
y1k2l
yközé2
ykö2z1él
yk1uj
yme2g
ymeg1á
yo2gi
yoki2
y1o2k1ir
y1o2kos
y1o2koz
y1oktá
yo2laj
y1oldá
yo2m1e
yo2m1ol
yo2n1e
yoné2
yo2néh
yo2nis
yo2niz
yo2n1í
yon3n
yon1s
yo2nü
y1o2pe
y1orm
y1orom
y1orrú
yo2se
yos3s
yo2sú
y1oszt
yó2gya
yó2gy1e2
yó2gyé
yó2gyi
y1ó2lo
yó2rai
yó2ráj
yó2rák
yó2rán
yó2rás
yó2rát
yó2riá
yós3s
yó2s1ü
y1öb
yö2kés
y1önt
yö2r1i
y1ö2töd
y1ötv
yö2zön
yőe2
y1őrl
y1őrr
y1őrs
y1őrz
ypen3
yp2re
yp2ré
yp2ro
yp2ró
y1p2s
yren2d1ő
ysé2gel
y1s2k
y1s2p
yst2
y1stí
y1str
y1sz2l
y1sz2r
y1sz2t
y2t1ac
y1t2h
y1t2r
yu2g1á
yu2ge
y1ugr
yu2gy
y1ujj
yu2l1e
yu2n
y1uno
y1u2ra
y1u2rá
yu2sé
y1u2szo
y1utc
y1újs
yú2kó
yúl1l
yú1p2
y1ú2ri
yú2szá
y1útj
yú2ton
y1útró
y1útt
y1üd
y1ü2gy
y1üld
yü2t
y1üte
y1üté
yü2ze
yü2zé
y1üzl
y1ű2ző
yvai2
yva2j
yv1ajá
yv1ank
yv1a2ra
yv1állo
yv1állv
yv1á2rak
y2v1áru
yve2g
yvegy1
yv1érté
y2v1in
y2v1í2r
y2vu
y2v1ú
yv1üg
yze2t1a2
yze2tele
yze2t1o
1za
2z1a2cé
z1a2dag
za2d1ár
zade2
za2del
za2dí
z1a2dog
za2dóh
za2dói
za2dót
zae2
za2g1e
zai2g
za2jan
za2j1árt
z1a2kara
z1a2karó
za2k1av
za2kem
za2k1i2r
za2k1ír
za2k1osz
zalé2ké
2zanya
zao2
z1a2pó.
z1a2pók
z1a2ráb
za2rány
2zarc
za2sem
za1s2l
zat1akt
za2t1a2n
zata2r
zat1ará
za2tem
za2t1in
za2t1ív
2zaty
z1a2tya
za2tyá
zau2t
z1az.
z1azh
za2zo
1zá
z1ábr
záé2
zá2g1al
zá2gat
zá2g1ál
zá2ge
zág1g
zá2g1ú
2z1á2gy
zá2kin
zále2
zá2l1eg
zá2l1em
zá2lér
2záll
zá2los
zál1t2r
zá2m1a2d
zá2map
zá2mar
zá2mis
zá2nú
z1á2rada
z1á2ram
zá2r1is
zá2r1osz
zá2r1ó2ra
zá2rö
zár1s2
zá2sin
záskész1
2z1á2só
záte2r
z1átv
zázé2
zá2zév
zá2z1ol
záz3sz
z1b2
zbee2
zdas2
z2d1ass
zd2ró
zd1ur
1ze
2zea2
zeá2z
2z1eb.
ze2bei
ze2bek
z1e2dz
zee2
zegész1
ze2gol
2zegy
ze2gyes
z1egyn
z1egys
zei2g
zei2s
ze2k1e2g
ze2kép
ze2lál
z1elej
ze2l1eml
z1e2lemz
z1elhá
2zellen
z1elnö
ze2l1os
ze2lőg
z1elvo
ze2mad
ze2már
zeme2iké
ze2m1ell
2zemés
zem1id
ze2m1iz
zenci2a
zene2tel
zen2tan
zen2t1est
zen2tí
zeo2m
zeö2
ze2per
ze1ph
ze1p2r
ze2rad
ze2raj
ze2ran
ze2r1ar
ze2r1as
zer1ára
ze2redő
zere2g
zer1egg
ze2r1egy
zer1ejt
2zerejü
ze2r1él
ze2r1ill
ze2r1ip
ze2ris
2zerj
ze2ror
2z1e2rő
zer1s
ze2r1u2
ze2set
ze2sit
ze2ső
2z1esté
zes1ut
ze2süv
zesz1ár.
ze2széle
ze2szip
2zeszk
zes3zs
ze2t1any
ze2tál
ze2tát
ze2t1ell
ze2telm
ze2térte
ze2tí
zetme2
zetmeg1
ze2tok
ze2t1ó2r
ze2ty
z1e2ur
2zev
ze2vez
z1e2vol
ze2vő
ze2zer
2z1ezre.
2zezred
2zezrei.
2zezreir
2zezreit
2zezreiv
2zezrek
2zezrel
2zezres
2zezret
1zé
zé2dal
zé2d1elem
zé2d1és
zé2dz
2zég
z1é2ge
zé2hes
2z1éhs
z1éjs
zé2kin
zé2lak
zé2l1á2
2zé2lel
zél1elt
zé2lene
zé2l1e2r
2zélet.
2z1é2letb
2z1é2lete
2z1é2leté
2z1é2leti
2z1é2letr
zé2lir
zé2lo
zé2lu
zéndio2
zéne2
zé2neg
zé2n1el
zé2n1is
zé2nu
zé2p1a2
zé2pá
zép1emb
zé2p1ér
zé2pir
zé2pis
2zépí
zé2p1o
zé2pu
2zépül
zé2r1á2
zé2reg
zér1emb
zé2rés
zé2rig
zé2r1o
zé2rőt
2z1érté
2z1érth
2z1érz
zé2sa
zé2sel
zé2sí
zés3s
zé2tap
zé2t1á2
zé2te2l
zét1ele
zét1ese
zét1esn
zét1est
zé2ti
2zétk
zé2t1o
zé2tö
zé2tu
zé2tú
zé2t1ü
zé2tű
z1év.
zé2vek
2z1é2ven
2z1é2ves
2z1é2vi
2z1évn
zf2
zfe2l1em
zfe2li
z2féri
z1fr
z1g2
zgás3s
zgá2sz
zgés3s
zgó1s2
zhad1
zharminc1
1zi
zi2ac
2zicc
zi1ch
z1i2dé
z1i2dő
zie2l
zie2m
zigaz1
2zigazg
zi2gáz
2z1i2gén
zi1g2r
zikus1s
z1imma
zi2n1á2r
z1indu
zi2nol
zi2nór
zin2t1el
zin2ter
zin2to
zi2ol
zi2óc
zi2óp
z1i2par
zi1p2l
zi1p2r
z1i2rat
2z1i2rá
zi2rod
zi2sal
zi2seg
zise2l
zis1ele
z1isko
2z1ism
zi2sor
zis3szi
2z1iste
zi2tut
ziú2
2z1i2vó
2zizm
zi2zom
2zizz
1zí
zí2n1ál
zí2nár
zí2n1o
zí2nu
z1í2ró
zítés3s
zí2val
zí2viz
2z1í2z
z1kh
zkiá2
zkie2
z2k1ing
zk2le
z1k2lin
z1k2lu
zkon2tár
z2kopi
z2kópiá
z2kópr
z1k2ra
z1k2ru
z1k2val
zle2ta
zle2tá
zle2t1emb
zle2ter
zle2t1o
z2log
zme2g1á
z2nob
1zo
zoki2
zok1ir
zo2koz
2z1o2laj
2z1oll
zo2mag
2zomh
2zomv
2zomz
zo2naj
zo2n1áll
zo2ner
zoné2
zo2név
zon2tel
zon2tol
zo2nyan
zo2nye
zo1phi
zo2ran
zo2rar
zo2r1as
2zorg
z1orke
z1orr.
z1orrú
z1orvo
2z1o2x
1zó
zóá2
zó1dre
zó1p2
z1ó2rai
z1ó2ras
zó2ta.
zó2t1ért
zó1t2h
zó1t2r
zózat1át
1zö
zög1ért
zö2g1öl
3zölde
zöl2din
z1ölel
zö2les
2zöne
2zönö
2z1ötv
2zöv
2z1ö2z
1ző
ző1dr
zőe2r
zőren2
zőrend1
ző2ro
2zőrs
2zőrz
zőu2
zpen3
z1p2l
z1p2ro
z1p2ró
zre2d3z
zren2d1ő
z2s
1zsa
2zsaj
zs1a2la
2zs1amu
z3sapk
1zsá
2zság
z3ság.
z3sága
z3ságá
z3ságt
zsá2rá
1zse
z3sej
1zsé
2z3ség
2zs1ép
zs1érv
1zsi
2zsir
zs1iro
2zs1ita
1zsí
z3sík
2z3síp
1zso
2zsor
zs1orv
1zsó
1zsö
1zső
zsp2
zs3s
zst2
z3s2tí
1zsu
1zsú
z3súl
1zsü
zs1üg
zs1ü2té
1zsű
zsz2
z3sza
z3szá
z3szeg
z3szek
z3szem
zs3zen
z3szere
z3szé
z3szí
z3szo
z3szó
z3sző
zszt2
z3szu
z3szü
z3szű
zt1a2dó
zt1apá
z2t1arc
zt1assz
z2táld
zt1á2ram
z2tátj
z2tátu
ztá2v1i2
z2t1elo
z2t1emb
z2tep
z2tered
z2tesem
z2t1é2g
z2t1é2le
z2t1érté
zt2hen
ztia2
z2t1id
zti2g
z2t1igé
z2t1i2p
z2t1irá
z2t1iré
z2t1í2r
zto1g2
zto2n1
zto2ris
z2torit
zto1szk
ztó1dr
zt2ráj
z1t2ré
z2túj
z2t1út
ztül1l
z2t1üt
1zu
zu2b1a
3zubb
zu2b1i
zu1c2
zu2g1ár
zu2gí
z1ugr
zu2gu
2z1uj
zule2
zu2l1esi
z1urn
zu2só
2zut
z1u2ta
z1u2tá
z1u2tó
3zuz
1zú
2zúj
z1ú2jo
z1újs
2zút
z1úth
z1útj
z1ú2to
z1úts
3zúz
1zü
2z1üd
2züg
zü2ni
zürkés1
2züs
2züt
z1ü2té
z1ü2tő
z1ü2v
2züz
zü2zem
z1üzl
1zű
zű2csi
zű2k1a
zű2za
zű2zér
z1ű2ző
zz1áll
z2zs2
z3zsí
zz3st
}
